Maryland, session 2025, SB0846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–108.
A CELLULAR PHONE CARRIER THAT OFFERS A SERVICE CONTRACT FOR
CELLULAR PHONE SERVICES SHALL INCLUDE AN OPTION IN THE SERVICE
CONTRACT THAT ALLOWS MORE THAN ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A CUSTOMER OF
RECORD TO THE SERVICE CONTRACT TO ALTER, MODIFY, OR CANCEL THE SERVICE
CONTRACT WITHOUT THE AGREEMENT OF THE OTHER CUSTOMERS OF RECORD IF
ALL OF THE CUSTOMERS OF RECORD AGREE IN WRITING TO THE OPTION ON
EXECUTION OF THE SERVICE CONTRACT.
A CELLULAR PHONE CARRIER SHALL ALLOW:
(1) THE CUSTOMER OF RECORD WHO IS RESPONSIBLE FOR PAYMENT
ON AN ACCOUNT TO DESIGNATE OTHER INDIVIDUALS AS AUTHORIZED USERS ON THE
ACCOUNT; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 334 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL DESIGNATED AS AN AUTHORIZED USER ON AN
ACCOUNT TO PURCHASE SERVICES OR DEVICES OR TO TAKE ADDITIONAL ACTION
UNDER ANY SERVICE CONTRACT CONNECTED TO THE ACCOUNT TO THE EXTENT
THAT THE AUTHORIZATION EXTENDS TO THE ACTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –